Utah statutes.
59-2-213.   Duty to furnish assessment roll to counties.
(1)  The commission shall prepare and furnish to each county an assessment
roll in which the county assessor of each county shall list all property
within the county.
(2)  In counties using computerized listings, the county assessor shall
furnish the information required under Subsection (1) pursuant to procedures
established by the commission.
